Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 25. Reckless or Careless Driving and Miscellaneous Rules.

§ 63-3-1201.
Reckless driving.

Any person who drives any vehicle in such a manner as to indicate either a wilful or a wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving. Reckless driving shall be considered a greater offense than careless driving.

Every person convicted of reckless driving shall be punished upon a first conviction by a fine of not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and on a second or subsequent conviction he may be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days or by a fine of not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1993, ch. 317, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993 (became law without Governor’s signature on March 16, 1993).

§ 63-3-1203.
Operation of vehicle under circumstances which interfere with driver’s view or control over driving mechanism; interference with driver’s view or control by passenger.

No person shall drive a vehicle when it is so loaded or when there are in the front seat such number of persons, exceeding three, as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in such position as to interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with his control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8220; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1205.
Driving through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways.

The driver of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways shall hold such motor vehicle under control and as near the right-hand edge of the highway as reasonably possible and, upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of 200 feet along the highway, shall give audible warning with the horn of such motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8221; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1207.
Coasting upon down grade.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a down grade shall not coast with the gears of such vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a commercial motor vehicle when traveling upon a down grade shall not coast with the clutch disengaged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8222; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1209.
Crossing unprotected fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when laid down on any street or private driveway, to be used at any fire or alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8224; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1211.
Throwing, etc., of glass or other injurious material on highway; removal of glass or other injurious material by person removing wrecked or damaged vehicle from highway.

No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle upon such highway.

Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown, upon any highway any destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove the same or cause it to be removed.

Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from such vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8225; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1213.
Careless driving.

Any person who drives any vehicle in a careless or imprudent manner, without due regard for the width, grade, curves, corner, traffic and use of the streets and highways and all other attendant circumstances is guilty of careless driving. Careless driving shall be considered a lesser offense than reckless driving.

Every person convicted of careless driving shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993 (became law without Governor’s signature on March 16, 1993).

§ 63-3-1215.
Drag racing on public roads prohibited; penalties.

No person shall drive any vehicle upon the public roads in this state in any race, speed competition or contest, drag race or acceleration contest, test of physical endurance, exhibition of speed or acceleration, or for the purpose of making a speed record, and no person shall in any manner participate in any such race, speed competition, drag race, test or physical endurance, exhibition, or purpose of making a speed record.

For the purposes of this section “drag race” means the operation of two (2) or more vehicles from a point side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive attempt to out distance each other, or the operation of one or more vehicles over a common selected course, from the same point to the same point, for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a certain distance or time limit on the public roads of this state.

For the purposes of this section “racing” means the use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to out gain, out distance, or prevent another vehicle from passing, or to test the physical stamina or endurance of drivers over long distance driving routes on the public roads of this state.

Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

The prohibitions contained in this section do not apply to events sanctioned by local governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.